test/src/morphology/verbTVaeå_gt-norm.yaml
  Verb - gierret: # JIEHKET_TV
    gierret+V+TV+Inf: gierret 
    gierret+V+TV+Sup: gærátjit
    gierret+V+TV+Ger: gieredijn
    gierret+V+TV+PrfPrc: gærrám
    gierret+V+TV+Actio+Ess: gierremin
    gierret+V+TV+Actio+Ela: gierremis
    gierret+V+TV+VAbess: gierek
    gierret+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: gæráv
    gierret+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: gærá
    gierret+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl2: gierrebihtit
    gierret+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: gierri
    gierret+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg1: gierriv
    gierret+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg2: gierri
    gierret+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: gierij
    gierret+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du1: gierijma 
    gierret+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du2: gierijda
    gierret+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du3: gierijga
    gierret+V+TV+Imprt+Sg2: giere
    gierret+V+TV+Imprt+Sg3: gierris
    gierret+V+TV+Imprt+Du1: gærron 
    gierret+V+TV+Imprt+Du2: gierre
    gierret+V+TV+Imprt+Du3: gierriska
    gierret+V+TV+ImprtII+Pl1: gerrup
    gierret+V+TV+ImprtII+Pl2: gerrut
    gierret+V+TV+ImprtII+Pl3: gerrusa
    gierret+V+TV+Pot+Sg1: gieritjav
    gierret+V+TV+Pot+Sg2: gieritja
    gierret+V+TV+Pot+Sg3: gierisj
    gierret+V+TV+Pot+Pl3: gieritji
    gierret+V+TV+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: giereduváv

  Verb - diehtet: # DIEHTET_TV
    diehtet+V+TV+Inf: diehtet 
    diehtet+V+TV+Sup: diedátjit
    diehtet+V+TV+Ger: diededijn
    diehtet+V+TV+PrfPrc: diehtám
    diehtet+V+TV+Actio+Ess: diehtemin
    diehtet+V+TV+Actio+Ela: diehtemis
    diehtet+V+TV+VAbess: diedek
    diehtet+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: diedáv
    diehtet+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: diedá
    diehtet+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl2: diehtebihtit
    diehtet+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: diehti
    diehtet+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg1: diehtiv
    diehtet+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg2: diehti
    diehtet+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: diedij
    diehtet+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du1: diedijma 
    diehtet+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du2: diedijda
    diehtet+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du3: diedijga
    diehtet+V+TV+Imprt+Sg2: diede
    diehtet+V+TV+Imprt+Sg3: diehtis
    diehtet+V+TV+Imprt+Du1: diehton 
    diehtet+V+TV+Imprt+Du2: diehtte
    diehtet+V+TV+Imprt+Du3: diehtiska
    diehtet+V+TV+ImprtII+Pl1: diehtup
    diehtet+V+TV+ImprtII+Pl2: diehtut
    diehtet+V+TV+ImprtII+Pl3: diehtusa
    diehtet+V+TV+Pot+Sg1: dieditjav
    diehtet+V+TV+Pot+Sg2: dieditja
    diehtet+V+TV+Pot+Sg3: diedisj
    diehtet+V+TV+Pot+Pl3: dieditji
    diehtet+V+TV+Der/Pass+V+Inf: []

  Verb - hållat: # MÁHTTET_TV
    hållat+V+TV+Inf: hållat
    hållat+V+TV+Sup: hålatjit
    hållat+V+TV+Ger: håladijn
    hållat+V+TV+PrfPrc: hållam
    hållat+V+TV+Actio+Ess: hållamin
    hållat+V+TV+Actio+Ela: hållamis
    hållat+V+TV+VAbess: hålak
    hållat+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: hålav
    hållat+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: håla
    hållat+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl2: hållabihtit
    hållat+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: hålli
    hållat+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg1: hålliv
    hållat+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg2: hålli
    hållat+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: hålaj
    hållat+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du1: hålajma 
    hållat+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du2: hålajda
    hållat+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du3: hålajga
    hållat+V+TV+Imprt+Sg2: håla
    hållat+V+TV+Imprt+Sg3: hållis
    hållat+V+TV+Imprt+Du1: hållon 
    hållat+V+TV+Imprt+Du2: hoalle
    hållat+V+TV+Imprt+Du3: hålliska
    hållat+V+TV+ImprtII+Pl1: hållup
    hållat+V+TV+ImprtII+Pl2: hållut
    hållat+V+TV+ImprtII+Pl3: hållusa
    hållat+V+TV+Pot+Sg1: hålatjav
    hållat+V+TV+Pot+Sg2: hålatja
    hållat+V+TV+Pot+Sg3: hålasj
    hållat+V+TV+Pot+Pl3: hålatji
    hållat+V+TV+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: håladuvvá
